Tennessee statutes. Title 18 Clerks Of Courts
Part 1

Circuit, Criminal and Special Courts

18-4-101. Election — Tenure.

The clerks of the circuit and criminal courts and other special courts are elected by the qualified voters of the respective circuits and districts over which the local jurisdiction of the courts, respectively, extends.

The clerks' terms of office are four (4) years.

Code 1858, § 324; Shan., § 400; mod. Code 1932, § 650; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-401.

Cross-References. Consolidated retirement system, title 8, chs. 34-37, 39.

Deputies and assistants, §§8-20-101 —8-20-111.

Election of clerks and terms of office, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 13.

Salary, §§8-24-101 —8-24-109.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.31.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

Comparative Legislation. Circuit, criminal and other clerks:

Ala. Code §12-17-80 et seq.; §12-17-140 et seq.

Ark. Code §16-20-301 et seq.; §16-20-401 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §15-6-50 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. §§ 22A.040, 30A.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §§9-1-39,9-5-131 et seq.; §9-7-121 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 483.240 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. §§ 7A-40, 7A-100 et seq.

Va. Code § 17-40 et seq.

Cited: Metro. Gov't of Nashville v. Affiliated Computer Servs., — F. Supp. 2d —, 2008 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 59622 (M.D. Tenn. July 17, 2008).

18-4-102. Chapter applicable to criminal and special courts.

This chapter applies to clerks of the criminal and other special courts established by law.

Code 1858, § 4084; Shan., § 5898; Code 1932, § 10098; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-407.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Criminal Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 319.

18-4-103. Duties.

The clerk of each circuit court, in addition to the duties prescribed by chapters 1 and 2 of this title, is required to:

At each term of the court, when the jury is discharged, make out and certify a list of the jury, with the number of days they have served and the amount due to each, and deliver the list to the county clerk, to be registered by the county clerk, and certificates issued thereon as prescribed by § 18-6-105;

Make out and transmit to the clerk of the supreme court transcripts of the record, in all cases in which appeals in the nature of writs of error have been taken from the clerk of the circuit court's court, within forty (40) days after the rendition of the judgment, unless the case has been determined within forty (40) days of the session of the supreme court, or during such session, and in that event forthwith;

Enter up judgment of the court on its records, after the verdict of a jury;

Note on every execution or order of sale of land, the defendant's direction not to advertise the execution or order in a newspaper;

Present to the judge of the circuit or criminal court all bills of costs for the clerk of the circuit court's certificate, in criminal cases, in which the state or county is liable for the costs;

Record, at full length, on the minutes of the clerk of the circuit court's court, the papers returned into the court by a judge of the court of general sessions, for the purpose of having a condemnation of land levied on by execution from such judge, and order of sale;

Enter, at full length, upon the minutes of the court, the presentment or indictment in cases of felony;

Perform duties in relation to revenue as prescribed in §§ 9-2-108 — 9-2-122 and 9-2-135 [repealed];

Notify the Tennessee bureau of investigation of final disposition of criminal proceedings against a person as soon as practicable but no later than thirty (30) days after final disposition of the criminal proceedings; and

Perform such other duties as are, or may be, required by law.

Code 1858, § 4077 (deriv. Acts 1805, ch. 45, § 2; 1827, ch. 49, § 18; 1835-1836, ch. 17, § 11; 1841-1842, ch. 129, §§ 1, 5; 1843-1844, ch. 215, §§ 3, 9; 1849-1850, ch. 120, § 1); Acts 1866-1867, ch. 36, § 7; Shan., § 5892; Code 1932, § 10093; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-402; modified; Acts 1998, ch. 1080, § 9; 2016, ch. 739, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Section 9-2-135, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 7.

This section may be affected by T.R.A.P. 24 concerning content and preparation of the record on appeal.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added present (9) and redesignated former (9) as (10).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 739, § 3. April 7, 2016.

Cross-References. Accounting for fees, title 8, chapter 22.

Annual audit, §4-3-304.

Destruction of records upon dismissal or acquittal, title 40, ch. 32.

Fees, title 8, ch. 21, part 4.

Handling payments by delinquent revenue collectors, §§67-1-1612 —67-1-1614.

Payment for office supplies, §8-26-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 24.31, 31.50, 33.10.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 217; 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 12; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 36.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Cited: Crabtree v. Bank of Winchester, 108 Tenn. 483, 67 S.W. 797, 1901 Tenn. LEXIS 49 (1902); Louisville & N. R. Co. v. Ray, 124 Tenn. 16, 134 S.W. 858, 1910 Tenn. LEXIS 38 (1911); Baker Watkins Supply Co. v. Fowlkes, 129 Tenn. 663, 168 S.W. 153, 1914 Tenn. LEXIS 157 (1914); Tennessee Electric Power Co. v. Hanson, 18 Tenn. App. 542, 79 S.W.2d 818, 1934 Tenn. App. LEXIS 57 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1934); State v. Bouchard, 563 S.W.2d 561, 1977 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 265 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1977); Davis v. Davis, 924 S.W.2d 351, 1996 Tenn. LEXIS 356 (Tenn. 1996).

18-4-104. Adjournment of court.

Whenever the circuit court judge fails to hold court as required by law, the clerk may, at the expiration of the prescribed time, adjourn the court until the next term.

Code 1858, § 4079 (deriv. Acts 1817, ch. 130, § 1; 1835-1836, ch. 5, § 5); Shan., § 5893; Code 1932, § 10093a; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-403.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Collateral References. 21 C.J.S. Courts § 150.

Courts
76.

18-4-105. Recognizances on adjournment.

The clerk is authorized, in cases where the court is adjourned pursuant to §18-4-104, to enter forfeiture of all recognizances previously taken, for the appearance of parties or witnesses, where the parties or witnesses, on being called by the sheriff, fail to appear in pursuance of the recognizances, or to take new recognizances from such of the parties as do appear, according to law, for their appearance at the next term of the court.

Code 1858, §§ 4080, 4081 (deriv. Acts 1817, ch. 130, § 1); Shan., §§ 5894, 5895; Code 1932, §§ 10094, 10095; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-404.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

18-4-106. Refusal to give new recognizance.

If any person, bound in a recognizance to appear, appears accordingly, but fails or refuses to enter into a new recognizance, similar to and of the purport and effect of the previous recognizance, for the person's appearance at the next term, the person shall be deemed to have surrendered to the sheriff, and shall be in custody until the person enters into such recognizance as is by law required upon surrender by bail in like cases.

Code 1858, § 4082 (deriv. Acts 1817, ch. 130, § 1); Shan., § 5896; Code 1932, § 10096; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-405.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 241.

18-4-107. Proceedings on forfeitures.

The same proceedings shall be had in all cases for forfeitures entered by the clerk, in pursuance of §§18-4-104 —18-4-106, as if the same had been entered by order of court.

Code 1858, § 4083 (deriv. Acts 1817, ch. 130, § 1); Shan., § 5897; Code 1932, § 10097; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 18-406.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Collateral References. Clerks of Courts
36.